ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.aff
SFX N N 57
SFX N   0     snintin     [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantin    .
SFX N   0     snintinchu  [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinchu .
SFX N   0     snintinchá  [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinchá .
SFX N   0     snintinchus [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinchus .
SFX N   0     snintinjina [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinjina .
SFX N   0     snintinpi   [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinpi  .
SFX N   0     snintinpis  [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinpis .
SFX N   0     snintinwan  [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinwan .
SFX N   0     snintintaj  [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantintaj .
SFX N   0     snintinri   [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinri  .
SFX N   0     snintinpaj  [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinpaj .
SFX N   0     snintinqa   [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinqa  .
SFX N   0     snintinrayku [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinrayku .
SFX N   0     snintinpuni [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinpuni .
SFX N   0     snintinña   [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinña  .
SFX N   0     snintinmanta [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinmanta .
SFX N   0     snintinman  [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinman .
SFX N   0     snintinsina [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinsina .
SFX N   0     snintinkama [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinkama .
SFX N   0     snintinjawa [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinjawa .
SFX N   0     snintinpacha [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinpacha .
SFX N   0     snintinmá   [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinmá  .
SFX N   0     snintinmantapacha [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinmantapacha .
SFX N   0     kunantinniy .
SFX N   0     kunantinniyki .
SFX N   0     kunantinnin .
SFX N   0     kunantinninchej .
SFX N   0     kunantinniyku .
SFX N   0     kunantinniykichej .
SFX N   0     kunantinninku .
SFX N   0     snintinpa   [aeiou]
SFX N   0     snintinpata [aeiou]
SFX N   0     kunantinpa  .
SFX N   0     kunantinpata .

SFX p N 60
SFX p   0     ntinniyta   [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntinniykita [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntinninchejta [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntinniykuta [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntinniykichejta [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntinninkuta [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinniyta [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinniykita [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinninchejta [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinniykuta [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinniykichejta [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinninkuta [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntinta      [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinta    [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintachu   [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintachu [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintachá   [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintachá [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintachus  [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintachus [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntinjinata  [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinjinata [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntinpita    [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinpita  [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintapis   [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintapis [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintawan   [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintawan [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintataj   [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintataj [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintari    [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintari  [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintapaj   [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintapaj [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintaqa    [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintaqa  [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintapuni  [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintapuni [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintaña    [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintaña  [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintasina  [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintasina [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntinpachata [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinpachata [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintamá    [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintamá  [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintapis   [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintari    [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintaraj   [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintawan   [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintapuni  [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntintaña    [aeiou]
SFX p   0     ntinjawata  [aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintapis [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintari  [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintaraj [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintawan [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintapuni [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintintaña  [^aeiou]
SFX p   0     nintinjawata [^aeiou]

SFX P N 67
SFX P   0     snintinniyta [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinniykita [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinninchejta [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinniykuta [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinniykichejta [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinninkuta [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantinniyta .
SFX P   0     kunantinniykita .
SFX P   0     kunantinninchejta .
SFX P   0     kunantinniykuta .
SFX P   0     kunantinniykichejta .
SFX P   0     kunantinninkuta .
SFX P   0     snintinta   [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantinta  .
SFX P   0     snintintachu [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintachu .
SFX P   0     snintintachá [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintachá .
SFX P   0     snintintachus [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintachus .
SFX P   0     snintinjinata [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantinjinata .
SFX P   0     sinintintapi [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunainintintapi .
SFX P   0     snintintapis [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintapis .
SFX P   0     snintintawan [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintawan .
SFX P   0     snintintataj [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintataj .
SFX P   0     snintintari [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintari .
SFX P   0     snintintapaj [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintapaj .
SFX P   0     snintintaqa [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintaqa .
SFX P   0     snintintapuni [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintapuni .
SFX P   0     snintintaña [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintaña .
SFX P   0     snintintasina [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintasina .
SFX P   0     snintinpachata [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantinpachata .
SFX P   0     snintintamá [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintamá .
SFX P   0     snintintapis [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintintari [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintintaraj [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintintawan [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintintapuni [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintintaña [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinjawata [aeiou]
SFX P   0     kunantintapis .
SFX P   0     kunantintari .
SFX P   0     kunantintaraj .
SFX P   0     kunantintawan .
SFX P   0     kunantintapuni .
SFX P   0     kunantintaña .
SFX P   0     kunantinjawata .
SFX P   0     snintinniy  [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinniyki [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinnin  [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinninchej [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinniyku [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinniykichej [aeiou]
SFX P   0     snintinninku [aeiou]

SFX u N 4
SFX u   0     ntinyoj     [aeiou]
SFX u   0     nintinyoj   [^aeiou]
SFX u   0     ntillanyoj  [aeiou]
SFX u   0     nintillanyoj [^aeiou]
